Illinois, session 104th, SB2494.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Regulatory Sunset Act is amended by 5changing Section 4.36 and by adding Section 4.41 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 80/4.36)7    Sec. 4.36. Acts repealed on January 1, 2026. The following 8Acts are repealed on January 1, 2026: 9    The Barber, Cosmetology, Esthetics, Hair Braiding, and 10Nail Technology Act of 1985.11    The Collection Agency Act.12    The Hearing Instrument Consumer Protection Act.13    The Illinois Athletic Trainers Practice Act.14    The Illinois Dental Practice Act. 15    The Illinois Roofing Industry Licensing Act.16    The Illinois Physical Therapy Act.17    The Professional Geologist Licensing Act.18    The Respiratory Care Practice Act.19(Source: P.A. 99-26, eff. 7-10-15; 99-204, eff. 7-30-15; 2099-227, eff. 8-3-15; 99-229, eff. 8-3-15; 99-230, eff. 8-3-15; 2199-427, eff. 8-21-15; 99-469, eff. 8-26-15; 99-492, eff. 2212-31-15; 99-642, eff. 7-28-16.)   SB2494 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 09451 AAS 19511 b1    (5 ILCS 80/4.41 new)2    Sec. 4.41. Acts repealed on January 1, 2031. The following 3Acts are repealed on January 1, 2031:4    The Illinois Athletic Trainers Practice Act.5    The Respiratory Care Practice Act. 6    Section 10. The Illinois Athletic Trainers Practice Act is 7amended by changing Sections 3, 4, 5, 8, 9, 11, 12, 13, 14, 16, 817, 18, 19, 19.5, 22, 24, 27, 28, and 30 and by adding Section 93.5 as follows: 10    (225 ILCS 5/3)  (from Ch. 111, par. 7603)11    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)12    Sec. 3. Definitions. As used in this Act:13    (1) "Department" means the Department of Financial and 14Professional Regulation.15    (2) "Secretary" means the Secretary of Financial and 16Professional Regulation.17    (3) (Blank). "Board" means the Illinois Board of Athletic 18Trainers appointed by the Secretary.19    (4) "Licensed athletic trainer" means a person licensed to 20practice athletic training as defined in this Act and with the 21specific qualifications set forth in Section 9 of this Act 22who, upon the direction or consultation of a physician, 23carries out the practice of evaluation, prevention or 24emergency care, or physical reconditioning of injuries   SB2494 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 09451 AAS 19511 b1incurred by athletes conducted by an educational institution, 2professional athletic organization, sanctioned amateur 3athletic organization, performing arts setting, clinical 4setting, or employment setting employing the athletic trainer; 5or a person who, under the direction of a physician, carries 6out comparable functions for a health organization-based 7extramural program of athletic training services for athletes. 8Specific duties of the athletic trainer include, but are not 9limited to:10        A. Supervision of the selection, fitting, and 11    maintenance of protective equipment;12        B. Provision of assistance to the coaching staff in 13    the development and implementation of conditioning 14    programs;15        C. Counseling of athletes on nutrition and hygiene;16        D. Supervision of athletic training facility and 17    inspection of playing facilities;18        E. Selection and maintenance of athletic training 19    equipment and supplies;20        F. (Blank);21        G. Coordination with a physician to provide:22            (i) pre-competition physical exam and health 23        history updates,24            (ii) game coverage or phone access to a physician 25        or paramedic,26            (iii) follow-up injury care,  SB2494 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 09451 AAS 19511 b1            (iv) reconditioning programs, and2            (v) assistance on all matters pertaining to the 3        health and well-being of athletes;4        H. Provision of on-site injury care and evaluation as 5    well as appropriate transportation, follow-up treatment 6    and reconditioning as necessary for all injuries sustained 7    by athletes in the program;8        I. With a physician, determination of when an athlete 9    may safely return to full participation post-injury;10        J. Maintenance of complete and accurate records of all 11    athlete injuries and treatments rendered; and12        K. Written reports to a referring individual every 30 13    days services are provided. 14    To carry out these functions the athletic trainer is 15authorized to utilize modalities, including, but not limited 16to, heat, light, sound, cold, electricity, exercise, or 17mechanical devices related to care and reconditioning. An 18athletic trainer may also carry out these functions upon 19receiving a referral. A licensed athletic trainer shall use 20"LAT" or "L.A.T." in connection with the athletic trainer's 21name to denote licensure under this Act. 22    (5) "Referral" means the written authorization for 23athletic trainer services as provided in paragraph (4) given 24by a physician, physician assistant, advanced practice 25registered nurse, podiatric physician, or dentist, who shall 26maintain medical supervision of the athlete and makes a   SB2494 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 09451 AAS 19511 b1diagnosis or verifies that the patient's condition is such 2that it may be treated by an athletic trainer.3    (6) "Aide" means a person who has received on-the-job 4training specific to the facility in which that person he or 5she is employed, on either a paid or volunteer basis, but is 6not enrolled in an accredited curriculum. 7    (7) "Address of record" means the designated address 8recorded by the Department in the applicant's or licensee's 9application file or license file as maintained by the 10Department's licensure maintenance unit. It is the duty of the 11applicant or licensee to inform the Department of any change 12of address, and those changes must be made either through the 13Department's website or by contacting the Department. 14    (8) "Email address of record" means the designated email 15address recorded by the Department in the applicant's 16application file or the licensee's license file, as maintained 17by the Department's licensure maintenance unit. 18    (9) (8) "Board of Certification" means the Board of 19Certification for the Athletic Trainer. 20    (10) (9) "Athlete" means a person participating in an 21activity that requires a level of strength, endurance, 22flexibility, range of motion, speed, or agility which may 23include exercise, sports, recreation, wellness, or employment 24activity.25    (11) (10) "Physician assistant" means a physician 26assistant licensed to practice under the Physician Assistant   SB2494 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 09451 AAS 19511 b1Practice Act of 1987 in accordance with a written 2collaborative agreement with a physician licensed to practice 3medicine in all of its branches.4    (12) (11) "Advanced practice registered nurse" means an 5advanced practice registered nurse licensed to practice under 6the Nurse Practice Act. 7(Source: P.A. 102-940, eff. 1-1-23.) 8    (225 ILCS 5/3.5 new)9    Sec. 3.5. Address of record; email address of record. All 10applicants and licensees shall:11        (1) provide a valid address and email address to the 12    Department, which shall serve as the address of record and 13    email address of record, respectively, at the time of 14    application for licensure or renewal of a license; and15        (2) inform the Department of any change of address of 16    record or email address of record within 14 days after 17    such change either through the Department's website or by 18    contacting the Department's licensure maintenance unit. 19    (225 ILCS 5/4)  (from Ch. 111, par. 7604)20    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)21    Sec. 4. Licensure; exempt activities. No person shall 22provide any of the services set forth in subsection (4) of 23Section 3 of this Act, or use the title "athletic trainer", 24"certified athletic trainer", "athletic trainer certified", or   SB2494 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 09451 AAS 19511 b1"licensed athletic trainer" or the letters "LAT", "L.A.T.", 2"A.T.", "C.A.T.", "A.T.C.", "A.C.T.", or "I.A.T.L." after the 3athletic trainer's name, unless licensed under this Act.4    Nothing in this Act shall be construed as preventing or 5restricting the practice, services, or activities of:6        (1) Any person licensed or registered in this State by 7    any other law from engaging in the profession or 8    occupation for which the person he or she is licensed or 9    registered.10        (2) Any person employed as an athletic trainer by the 11    Government of the United States, if such person provides 12    athletic training solely under the direction or control of 13    the organization by which the person he or she is 14    employed.15        (3) Any person pursuing a course of study leading to a 16    degree in athletic training at an accredited educational 17    program if such activities and services constitute a part 18    of a supervised course of study involving daily personal 19    or verbal contact at the site of supervision between the 20    athletic training student and the licensed athletic 21    trainer who plans, directs, advises, and evaluates the 22    student's athletic training clinical education. The 23    supervising licensed athletic trainer must be on-site 24    where the athletic training clinical education is being 25    obtained. A person meeting the criteria under this 26    paragraph (3) must be designated by a title which clearly   SB2494 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 09451 AAS 19511 b1    indicates the person's his or her status as a student.2        (4) (Blank).3        (5) The practice of athletic training under the 4    supervision of a licensed athletic trainer by one who has 5    applied in writing to the Department for licensure and has 6    complied with all the provisions of Section 9 except the 7    passing of the examination to be eligible to receive such 8    license. This temporary right to act as an athletic 9    trainer shall expire 3 months after the filing of a 10    person's his or her written application to the Department; 11    when the applicant has been notified of the applicant's 12    his or her failure to pass the examination authorized by 13    the Department; when the applicant has withdrawn the 14    applicant's his or her application; when the applicant has 15    received a license from the Department after successfully 16    passing the examination authorized by the Department; or 17    when the applicant has been notified by the Department to 18    cease and desist from practicing, whichever occurs first. 19    This provision shall not apply to an applicant who has 20    previously failed the examination. 21        (6) Any person in a coaching position from rendering 22    emergency care on an as needed basis to the athletes under 23    the person's his or her supervision when a licensed 24    athletic trainer is not available.25        (7) Any person who is an athletic trainer from another 26    state or territory of the United States or another nation,   SB2494 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 09451 AAS 19511 b1    state, or territory acting as an athletic trainer while 2    performing the person's his or her duties for the his or 3    her respective non-Illinois based team or organization, so 4    long as the person's duties are restricted to the 5    respective he or she restricts his or her duties to his or 6    her team or organization during the course of the his or 7    her team's or organization's stay in this State. For the 8    purposes of this Act, a team shall be considered based in 9    Illinois if its home contests are held in Illinois, 10    regardless of the location of the team's administrative 11    offices. 12        (8) The practice of athletic training by persons 13    licensed in another state who have applied in writing to 14    the Department for licensure by endorsement. This 15    temporary right to act as an athletic trainer shall expire 16    6 months after the filing of such person's his or her 17    written application to the Department; upon the withdrawal 18    of the application for licensure under this Act; upon 19    delivery of a notice of intent to deny the application 20    from the Department; or upon the denial of the application 21    by the Department, whichever occurs first.22        (9) The practice of athletic training by one who has 23    applied in writing to the Department for licensure and has 24    complied with all the provisions of Section 9. This 25    temporary right to act as an athletic trainer shall expire 26    6 months after the filing of that individual's his or her   SB2494 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 09451 AAS 19511 b1    written application to the Department; upon the withdrawal 2    of the application for licensure under this Act; upon 3    delivery of a notice of intent to deny the application 4    from the Department; or upon the denial of the application 5    by the Department, whichever occurs first.6        (10) The practice of athletic training by persons 7    actively licensed as an athletic trainer in another state 8    or territory of the United States or another country, or 9    currently certified by the Board of Certification, or its 10    successor entity, at a special athletic tournament or 11    event conducted by a sanctioned amateur athletic 12    organization for no more than 14 days. This shall not 13    include contests or events that are part of a scheduled 14    series of regular season events.15        (11) Aides from performing patient care activities 16    under the on-site supervision of a licensed athletic 17    trainer. These patient care activities shall not include 18    interpretation of referrals or evaluation procedures, 19    planning or major modifications of patient programs, 20    administration of medication, or solo practice or event 21    coverage without immediate access to a licensed athletic 22    trainer. 23        (12) (Blank). 24(Source: P.A. 102-940, eff. 1-1-23; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23.) 25    (225 ILCS 5/5)  (from Ch. 111, par. 7605)  SB2494 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 09451 AAS 19511 b1    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)2    Sec. 5. Administration of Act; rules and forms.3    (a) The Department shall exercise the powers and duties 4prescribed by the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois for 5the administration of Licensure Acts and shall exercise such 6other powers and duties necessary for effectuating the 7purposes of this Act.8    (b) The Department Secretary may adopt promulgate rules 9consistent with the provisions of this Act for the 10administration and enforcement thereof, and for the payment of 11fees connected therewith, and may prescribe forms which shall 12be issued in connection therewith. The rules may include 13standards and criteria for licensure, certification, and 14professional conduct and discipline. The Department may 15consult with the Board in promulgating rules. 16    (c) (Blank). The Department may at any time seek the 17advice and the expert knowledge of the Board on any matter 18relating to the administration of this Act.19    (d) (Blank).20(Source: P.A. 99-469, eff. 8-26-15.) 21    (225 ILCS 5/8)  (from Ch. 111, par. 7608)22    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)23    Sec. 8. Examinations. If an applicant neglects, fails, or 24refuses to take an examination or fails to pass an examination 25for licensure under this Act within 3 years after filing an his   SB2494 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 09451 AAS 19511 b1or her application, the application shall be denied. The 2applicant may thereafter make a new application accompanied by 3the required fee; however, the applicant shall meet all 4requirements in effect at the time of subsequent application 5before obtaining licensure. 6    The Department may employ consultants for the purposes of 7preparing and conducting examinations.8(Source: P.A. 99-469, eff. 8-26-15.) 9    (225 ILCS 5/9)  (from Ch. 111, par. 7609)10    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)11    Sec. 9. Qualifications for licensure. A person shall be 12qualified for licensure as an athletic trainer if the person 13fulfills the following he or she fulfills all of the 14following:15        (a) Has graduated from a curriculum in athletic 16    training accredited by the Commission on Accreditation of 17    Athletic Training Education (CAATE), its successor entity, 18    or its equivalent, as approved by the Department.19        (b) Gives proof of current certification, on the date 20    of application, in cardiopulmonary resuscitation (CPR) and 21    automated external defibrillators (AED) for Healthcare 22    Providers and Professional Rescuers or its equivalent 23    based on American Red Cross or American Heart Association 24    standards.25        (b-5) Has graduated from a 4-year 4 year accredited   SB2494 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 09451 AAS 19511 b1    college or university.2        (c) Has passed an examination approved by the 3    Department to determine the person's his or her fitness 4    for practice as an athletic trainer, or is entitled to be 5    licensed without examination as provided in Section 13 6    Sections 7 and 8 of this Act.7(Source: P.A. 99-469, eff. 8-26-15.) 8    (225 ILCS 5/11)  (from Ch. 111, par. 7611)9    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)10    Sec. 11. Inactive licenses; restoration. Any athletic 11trainer who notifies the Department in writing on forms 12prescribed by the Department, may elect to place the athletic 13trainer's his or her license on an inactive status and shall, 14subject to the rules of the Department, be excused from 15payment of renewal fees until he or she notifies the 16Department is notified in writing of the athletic trainer's 17his or her desire to resume active status.18    Any athletic trainer requesting restoration from inactive 19status shall be required to pay the current renewal fee, shall 20demonstrate compliance with continuing education requirements, 21if any, and shall be required to restore the athletic 22trainer's his or her license as provided in Section 12.23    Any athletic trainer whose license is in expired or 24inactive status shall not practice athletic training in the 25State of Illinois.   SB2494 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 09451 AAS 19511 b1(Source: P.A. 99-469, eff. 8-26-15.) 2    (225 ILCS 5/12)  (from Ch. 111, par. 7612)3    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)4    Sec. 12. Restoration of expired licenses. An athletic 5trainer who has permitted the athletic trainer's his or her 6license to expire or who has had a his or her license on 7inactive status may have the his or her license restored by 8making application to the Department and filing proof 9acceptable to the Department of the athletic trainer's his or 10her fitness to have the his or her license restored, and by 11paying the required fees. Proof of fitness may include sworn 12evidence certifying active lawful practice in another 13jurisdiction. 14    If the athletic trainer has not maintained an active 15practice in another jurisdiction satisfactory to the 16Department, the Department shall determine, by an evaluation 17program established by rule, the athletic trainer's his or her 18fitness for restoration of the license and shall establish 19procedures and requirements for restoration.20    Any athletic trainer whose license has been expired for 21more than 5 years may have the his or her license restored by 22making application to the Department and filing proof 23acceptable to the Department of the athletic trainer's his or 24her fitness to have the his or her license restored, including 25sworn evidence certifying to active practice in another   SB2494 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 09451 AAS 19511 b1jurisdiction and by paying the required restoration fee. 2However, any athletic trainer whose license has expired while 3he or she has been engaged (1) in the federal service in active 4duty with the Army of the United States, the United States 5Navy, the Marine Corps, the Air Force, the Coast Guard, or the 6State Militia called into the service or training of the 7United States of America, or (2) in training or education 8under the supervision of the United States preliminary to 9induction into the military service, may have the his or her 10license restored without paying any lapsed renewal fees or 11restoration fee, if within 2 years after termination of such 12service, training, or education, other than by dishonorable 13discharge, the Department is furnished with satisfactory 14evidence to the effect that the licensee has been so engaged 15and that the service, training, or education has been 16terminated he or she furnished the Department with an 17affidavit to the effect that he or she has been so engaged and 18that his or her service, training, or education has been so 19terminated.20(Source: P.A. 99-469, eff. 8-26-15.) 21    (225 ILCS 5/13)  (from Ch. 111, par. 7613)22    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)23    Sec. 13. Endorsement. The Department may, at its 24discretion, license as an athletic trainer, without 25examination, upon on payment of the required fee, an applicant   SB2494 Enrolled- 16 -LRB104 09451 AAS 19511 b1for licensure who is an athletic trainer registered or 2licensed under the laws of another jurisdiction if the 3requirements pertaining to athletic trainers in such 4jurisdiction were, at the date of the applicant's his or her 5registration or licensure, substantially equal to the 6requirements in force in Illinois on that date or equivalent 7to the requirements of this Act.8    An applicant for endorsement who has practiced for 10 9consecutive years in another jurisdiction shall meet the 10requirements for licensure by endorsement upon filing an 11application on forms provided by the Department, paying the 12required fee, and showing proof of licensure in another 13jurisdiction for at least 10 consecutive years without 14discipline by certified verification of licensure from the 15jurisdiction in which the applicant practiced. 16    Applicants have 3 years from the date of application to 17complete the application process. If the process has not been 18completed in 3 years, the application shall be denied, the fee 19forfeited and the applicant must reapply and meet the 20requirements in effect at the time of reapplication.21(Source: P.A. 102-940, eff. 1-1-23.) 22    (225 ILCS 5/14)  (from Ch. 111, par. 7614)23    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)24    Sec. 14. Fees; returned checks. The fees for 25administration and enforcement of this Act, including but not   SB2494 Enrolled- 17 -LRB104 09451 AAS 19511 b1limited to original licensure, renewal, and restoration shall 2be set by rule. The fees shall be non-refundable. 3    Any person who delivers a check or other payment to the 4Department that is returned to the Department unpaid by the 5financial institution upon which it is drawn shall pay to the 6Department, in addition to the amount already owed to the 7Department, a fine of $50.8    The fines imposed by this Section are in addition to any 9other discipline provided under this Act for unlicensed 10practice or practice on a nonrenewed license. The Department 11shall notify the person that payment of fees and fines shall be 12paid to the Department by certified check or money order 13within 30 calendar days of the notification. If, after the 14expiration of 30 days from the date of the notification, the 15person has failed to submit the necessary remittance, the 16Department shall automatically terminate the license or 17certificate or deny the application, without hearing. If, 18after termination or denial, the person seeks a license or 19certificate, the person he or she shall apply to the 20Department for restoration or issuance of the license or 21certificate and pay all fees and fines due to the Department. 22The Department may establish a fee for the processing of an 23application for restoration of a license or certificate to pay 24all expenses of processing this application. The Secretary may 25waive the fines due under this Section in individual cases 26where the Secretary finds that the fines would be unreasonable   SB2494 Enrolled- 18 -LRB104 09451 AAS 19511 b1or unnecessarily burdensome.2(Source: P.A. 99-469, eff. 8-26-15.) 3    (225 ILCS 5/16)  (from Ch. 111, par. 7616)4    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)5    Sec. 16. Grounds for discipline. 6    (1) The Department may refuse to issue or renew, or may 7revoke, suspend, place on probation, reprimand, or take other 8disciplinary or non-disciplinary action as the Department may 9deem proper, including fines not to exceed $10,000 for each 10violation, with regard to any licensee for any one or 11combination of the following:12        (A) Material misstatement in furnishing information to 13    the Department;14        (B) Violations of this Act, or of the rules or 15    regulations promulgated hereunder;16        (C) Conviction of or plea of guilty to any crime under 17    the Criminal Code of 2012 or the laws of any jurisdiction 18    of the United States that is (i) a felony, (ii) a 19    misdemeanor, an essential element of which is dishonesty, 20    or (iii) of any crime that is directly related to the 21    practice of the profession;22        (D) Fraud or any misrepresentation in applying for or 23    procuring a license under this Act, or in connection with 24    applying for renewal of a license under this Act;25        (E) Professional incompetence or gross negligence;  SB2494 Enrolled- 19 -LRB104 09451 AAS 19511 b1        (F) Malpractice;2        (G) Aiding or assisting another person, firm, 3    partnership, or corporation in violating any provision of 4    this Act or rules;5        (H) Failing, within 60 days, to provide information in 6    response to a written request made by the Department;7        (I) Engaging in dishonorable, unethical, or 8    unprofessional conduct of a character likely to deceive, 9    defraud or harm the public;10        (J) Habitual or excessive use or abuse of drugs 11    defined in law as controlled substances, alcohol, or any 12    other substance that results in the inability to practice 13    with reasonable judgment, skill, or safety;14        (K) Discipline by another state, unit of government, 15    government agency, the District of Columbia, territory, or 16    foreign nation, if at least one of the grounds for the 17    discipline is the same or substantially equivalent to 18    those set forth herein;19        (L) Directly or indirectly giving to or receiving from 20    any person, firm, corporation, partnership, or association 21    any fee, commission, rebate, or other form of compensation 22    for any professional services not actually or personally 23    rendered. Nothing in this subparagraph (L) affects any 24    bona fide independent contractor or employment 25    arrangements among health care professionals, health 26    facilities, health care providers, or other entities,   SB2494 Enrolled- 20 -LRB104 09451 AAS 19511 b1    except as otherwise prohibited by law. Any employment 2    arrangements may include provisions for compensation, 3    health insurance, pension, or other employment benefits 4    for the provision of services within the scope of the 5    licensee's practice under this Act. Nothing in this 6    subparagraph (L) shall be construed to require an 7    employment arrangement to receive professional fees for 8    services rendered;9        (M) A finding by the Department that the licensee 10    after having the licensee's his or her license disciplined 11    has violated the terms of probation;12        (N) Abandonment of an athlete;13        (O) Willfully making or filing false records or 14    reports in the person's his or her practice, including but 15    not limited to false records filed with State agencies or 16    departments;17        (P) Willfully failing to report an instance of 18    suspected child abuse or neglect as required by the Abused 19    and Neglected Child Reporting Act;20        (Q) Physical illness, including but not limited to 21    deterioration through the aging process, or loss of motor 22    skill that results in the inability to practice the 23    profession with reasonable judgment, skill, or safety;24        (R) Solicitation of professional services other than 25    by permitted institutional policy;26        (S) The use of any words, abbreviations, figures or   SB2494 Enrolled- 21 -LRB104 09451 AAS 19511 b1    letters with the intention of indicating practice as an 2    athletic trainer without a valid license as an athletic 3    trainer under this Act;4        (T) The evaluation or treatment of ailments of human 5    beings other than by the practice of athletic training as 6    defined in this Act or the treatment of injuries of 7    athletes by a licensed athletic trainer except by the 8    referral of a physician, physician assistant, advanced 9    practice registered nurse, podiatric physician, or 10    dentist;11        (U) Willfully violating or knowingly assisting in the 12    violation of any law of this State relating to the use of 13    habit-forming drugs;14        (V) Willfully violating or knowingly assisting in the 15    violation of any law of this State relating to the 16    practice of abortion;17        (W) Continued practice by a person knowingly having an 18    infectious communicable or contagious disease;19        (X) Being named as a perpetrator in an indicated 20    report by the Department of Children and Family Services 21    pursuant to the Abused and Neglected Child Reporting Act 22    and upon proof by clear and convincing evidence that the 23    licensee has caused a child to be an abused child or 24    neglected child as defined in the Abused and Neglected 25    Child Reporting Act;26        (X-5) Failure to provide a monthly report on the   SB2494 Enrolled- 22 -LRB104 09451 AAS 19511 b1    patient's progress to the referring physician, physician 2    assistant, advanced practice registered nurse, podiatric 3    physician, or dentist; 4        (Y) (Blank);5        (Z) Failure to fulfill continuing education 6    requirements;7        (AA) Allowing one's license under this Act to be used 8    by an unlicensed person in violation of this Act;9        (BB) Practicing under a false or, except as provided 10    by law, assumed name;11        (CC) Promotion of the sale of drugs, devices, 12    appliances, or goods provided in any manner to exploit the 13    client for the financial gain of the licensee;14        (DD) Gross, willful, or continued overcharging for 15    professional services;16        (EE) Mental illness or disability that results in the 17    inability to practice under this Act with reasonable 18    judgment, skill, or safety;19        (FF) Cheating on or attempting to subvert the 20    licensing examination administered under this Act;21        (GG) Violation of the Health Care Worker Self-Referral 22    Act; or23        (HH) Failure by a supervising athletic trainer of an 24    aide to maintain contact, including personal supervision 25    and instruction, to ensure the safety and welfare of an 26    athlete.   SB2494 Enrolled- 23 -LRB104 09451 AAS 19511 b1    All fines imposed under this Section shall be paid within 260 days after the effective date of the order imposing the fine 3or in accordance with the terms set forth in the order imposing 4the fine. 5    (2) The determination by a circuit court that a licensee 6is subject to involuntary admission or judicial admission as 7provided in the Mental Health and Developmental Disabilities 8Code operates as an automatic suspension. Such suspension will 9end only upon a finding by a court that the licensee is no 10longer subject to involuntary admission or judicial admission 11and issuance of an order so finding and discharging the 12licensee.13    (3) The Department may refuse to issue or may suspend 14without hearing, as provided for in the Code of Civil 15Procedure, the license of any person who fails to file a 16return, to pay the tax, penalty, or interest shown in a filed 17return, or to pay any final assessment of tax, penalty, or 18interest as required by any tax Act administered by the 19Illinois Department of Revenue, until such time as the 20requirements of any such tax Act are satisfied in accordance 21with subsection (a) of Section 2105-15 of the Department of 22Professional Regulation Law of the Civil Administrative Code 23of Illinois.24    (4) In enforcing this Section, the Department, upon a 25showing of a possible violation, may compel any individual who 26is licensed under this Act or any individual who has applied   SB2494 Enrolled- 24 -LRB104 09451 AAS 19511 b1for licensure to submit to a mental or physical examination or 2evaluation, or both, which may include a substance abuse or 3sexual offender evaluation, at the expense of the Department. 4The Department shall specifically designate the examining 5physician licensed to practice medicine in all of its branches 6or, if applicable, the multidisciplinary team involved in 7providing the mental or physical examination and evaluation. 8The multidisciplinary team shall be led by a physician 9licensed to practice medicine in all of its branches and may 10consist of one or more or a combination of physicians licensed 11to practice medicine in all of its branches, licensed 12chiropractic physicians, licensed clinical psychologists, 13licensed clinical social workers, licensed clinical 14professional counselors, and other professional and 15administrative staff. Any examining physician or member of the 16multidisciplinary team may require any person ordered to 17submit to an examination and evaluation pursuant to this 18Section to submit to any additional supplemental testing 19deemed necessary to complete any examination or evaluation 20process, including, but not limited to, blood testing, 21urinalysis, psychological testing, or neuropsychological 22testing.23    The Department may order the examining physician or any 24member of the multidisciplinary team to provide to the 25Department any and all records, including business records, 26that relate to the examination and evaluation, including any   SB2494 Enrolled- 25 -LRB104 09451 AAS 19511 b1supplemental testing performed. The Department may order the 2examining physician or any member of the multidisciplinary 3team to present testimony concerning this examination and 4evaluation of the licensee or applicant, including testimony 5concerning any supplemental testing or documents relating to 6the examination and evaluation. No information, report, 7record, or other documents in any way related to the 8examination and evaluation shall be excluded by reason of any 9common law or statutory privilege relating to communication 10between the licensee or applicant and the examining physician 11or any member of the multidisciplinary team. No authorization 12is necessary from the licensee or applicant ordered to undergo 13an evaluation and examination for the examining physician or 14any member of the multidisciplinary team to provide 15information, reports, records, or other documents or to 16provide any testimony regarding the examination and 17evaluation. The individual to be examined may choose to have, 18at the individual's his or her own expense, another physician 19of his or her choice present during all aspects of the 20examination.21    Failure of any individual to submit to a mental or 22physical examination or evaluation, or both, when directed, 23shall result in an automatic suspension without hearing, until 24such time as the individual submits to the examination. If the 25Department finds a licensee unable to practice because of the 26reasons set forth in this Section, the Department shall   SB2494 Enrolled- 26 -LRB104 09451 AAS 19511 b1require the licensee to submit to care, counseling, or 2treatment by physicians approved or designated by the 3Department as a condition for continued, reinstated, or 4renewed licensure.5    All substance-related violations shall mandate an 6automatic substance abuse assessment. Failure to submit to an 7assessment by a licensed physician who is certified as an 8addictionist or an advanced practice registered nurse with a 9specialty certification in addictions may be grounds for an 10automatic suspension.11    If the Department finds an individual unable to practice 12or unfit for duty because of the reasons set forth in this 13Section, the Department may require the individual to submit 14to a substance abuse evaluation or treatment by individuals or 15programs approved or designated by the Department, as a 16condition, term, or restriction for continued, restored, or 17renewed licensure to practice; or, in lieu of evaluation or 18treatment, the Department may file a complaint to immediately 19suspend, revoke, or otherwise discipline the license of the 20individual. An individual whose license was granted, 21continued, restored, renewed, disciplined, or supervised 22subject to such terms, conditions, or restrictions, and who 23fails to comply with such terms, conditions, or restrictions, 24shall be referred to the Secretary for a determination as to 25whether the individual shall have the registration suspended 26immediately, pending a hearing by the Department.   SB2494 Enrolled- 27 -LRB104 09451 AAS 19511 b1    When the Secretary immediately suspends a license under 2this Section, a hearing upon such person's license must be 3convened by the Department within 15 days after the suspension 4and completed without appreciable delay. The Department shall 5have the authority to review the licensee's record of 6treatment and counseling regarding the impairment to the 7extent permitted by applicable federal statutes and 8regulations safeguarding the confidentiality of medical 9records.10    Individuals licensed under this Act who are affected under 11this Section shall be afforded an opportunity to demonstrate 12to the Department that they can resume practice in compliance 13with acceptable and prevailing standards under the provisions 14of their license.15    (5) (Blank).16    (6) In cases where the Department of Healthcare and Family 17Services has previously determined a licensee or a potential 18licensee is more than 30 days delinquent in the payment of 19child support and has subsequently certified the delinquency 20to the Department, the Department may refuse to issue or renew 21or may revoke or suspend that person's license or may take 22other disciplinary action against that person based solely 23upon the certification of delinquency made by the Department 24of Healthcare and Family Services in accordance with paragraph 25(5) of subsection (a) of Section 2105-15 of the Department of 26Professional Regulation Law of the Civil Administrative Code   SB2494 Enrolled- 28 -LRB104 09451 AAS 19511 b1of Illinois. 2(Source: P.A. 102-940, eff. 1-1-23.) 3    (225 ILCS 5/17)  (from Ch. 111, par. 7617)4    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)5    Sec. 17. Violations; injunction; cease and desist order. 6    (a) If any person violates a provision of this Act, the 7Secretary may, in the name of the People of the State of 8Illinois, through the Attorney General of the State of 9Illinois or the State's Attorney of the county in which the 10violation is alleged to have occurred, petition for an order 11enjoining such violation or for an order enforcing compliance 12with this Act. Upon the filing of a verified petition in such 13court, the court may issue a temporary restraining order, 14without notice or bond, and may preliminarily and permanently 15enjoin such violation, and if it is established that such 16person has violated or is violating the injunction, the court 17may punish the offender for contempt of court. Proceedings 18under this Section shall be in addition to, and not in lieu of, 19all other remedies and penalties provided by this Act.20    (b) If any person holds oneself shall hold himself or 21herself out in a manner prohibited by this Act, any interested 22party or any person injured thereby may, in addition to the 23Secretary, petition for relief as provided in subsection (a) 24of this Section.25    (c) Whenever in the opinion of the Department any person   SB2494 Enrolled- 29 -LRB104 09451 AAS 19511 b1violates any provision of this Act, the Department may issue a 2rule to show cause why an order to cease and desist should not 3be entered against the person him or her. The rule shall 4clearly set forth the grounds relied upon by the Department 5and shall provide a period of 7 days from the date of the rule 6to file an answer to the satisfaction of the Department. 7Failure to answer to the satisfaction of the Department shall 8cause an order to cease and desist to be issued forthwith.9(Source: P.A. 99-469, eff. 8-26-15.) 10    (225 ILCS 5/18)  (from Ch. 111, par. 7618)11    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)12    Sec. 18. Investigations; notice and hearing. The 13Department may investigate the actions of any applicant or of 14any person or persons holding or claiming to hold a license. 15The Department shall, before refusing to issue or to renew a 16license or disciplining a registrant, at least 30 days prior 17to the date set for the hearing, notify in writing the 18applicant or licensee of the nature of the charges and the time 19and place that a hearing will be held on the charges. The 20Department shall direct the applicant or licensee to file a 21written answer under oath within 20 days after the service of 22the notice. In case the person fails to file an answer after 23receiving notice, the person's his or her license or 24certificate may, in the discretion of the Department, be 25suspended, revoked, or placed on probationary status, or the   SB2494 Enrolled- 30 -LRB104 09451 AAS 19511 b1Department may take whatever disciplinary action deemed 2proper, including limiting the scope, nature, or extent of the 3person's practice or the imposition of a fine, without a 4hearing, if the act or acts charged constitute sufficient 5grounds for such action under this Act. At the time and place 6fixed in the notice, the Department shall proceed to hear the 7charges, and the parties or their counsel shall be accorded 8ample opportunity to present such statements, testimony, 9evidence, and argument as may be pertinent to the charges or to 10their defense. The Department may continue a hearing from time 11to time. The written notice and any notice in the subsequent 12proceeding may be served by registered or certified mail to 13the licensee's address of record. 14(Source: P.A. 99-469, eff. 8-26-15; 99-642, eff. 7-28-16.) 15    (225 ILCS 5/19)  (from Ch. 111, par. 7619)16    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)17    Sec. 19. Record of proceedings. The Department, at its 18expense, shall preserve a record of all proceedings at the 19formal hearing of any case. The notice of hearing, complaint, 20and all other documents in the nature of pleadings and written 21motions filed in the proceedings, the transcript of testimony, 22the report of the Board and order of the Department shall be 23the record of such proceeding. Any licensee who is found to 24have violated this Act or who fails to appear for a hearing to 25refuse to issue, restore, or renew a license or to discipline a   SB2494 Enrolled- 31 -LRB104 09451 AAS 19511 b1licensee may be required by the Department to pay for the costs 2of the proceeding. These costs are limited to costs for court 3reporters, transcripts, and witness attendance and mileage 4fees. All costs imposed under this Section shall be paid 5within 60 days after the effective date of the order imposing 6the fine or in accordance with the terms set forth in the order 7imposing the fine. 8(Source: P.A. 99-469, eff. 8-26-15.) 9    (225 ILCS 5/19.5)10    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)11    Sec. 19.5. Subpoenas; oaths. The Department may subpoena 12and bring before it any person and may take the oral or written 13testimony of any person or compel the production of any books, 14papers, records, or any other documents that the Secretary or 15the Secretary's his or her designee deems relevant or material 16to an investigation or hearing conducted by the Department 17with the same fees and mileage and in the same manner as 18prescribed by law in judicial procedure in civil cases in 19courts of this State.20    The Secretary, the designated hearing officer, any member 21of the Board, or a certified shorthand court reporter may 22administer oaths at any hearing which the Department conducts. 23Notwithstanding any other statute or Department rule to the 24contrary, all requests for testimony or production of 25documents or records shall be in accordance with this Act.   SB2494 Enrolled- 32 -LRB104 09451 AAS 19511 b1(Source: P.A. 99-469, eff. 8-26-15.) 2    (225 ILCS 5/22)  (from Ch. 111, par. 7622)3    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)4    Sec. 22. Motion for rehearing Report of Board; motion for 5rehearing. In any case involving the refusal to issue or renew 6a license or the discipline of a licensee, a copy of the 7hearing officer's Board's report shall be served upon the 8respondent by the Department as provided under Section 18 of 9in this Act for the service of the notice of hearing. Within 20 10days after such service, the respondent may present to the 11Department a motion in writing for a rehearing, which motion 12shall specify the particular grounds therefor. If no motion 13for rehearing is filed, then upon the expiration of the time 14specified for filing such a motion, or if a motion for 15rehearing is denied, then upon such denial the Secretary may 16enter an order in accordance with recommendations of the 17Department, Board except as provided in Section 23 of this 18Act. If the respondent shall order from the reporting service, 19and pay for a transcript of the record within the time for 20filing a motion for rehearing, the 20 day period within which 21such a motion may be filed shall commence upon the delivery of 22the transcript to the respondent.23(Source: P.A. 99-469, eff. 8-26-15.) 24    (225 ILCS 5/24)  (from Ch. 111, par. 7624)  SB2494 Enrolled- 33 -LRB104 09451 AAS 19511 b1    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)2    Sec. 24. Hearing officer appointment. The Secretary shall 3have the authority to appoint any attorney duly licensed to 4practice law in the State of Illinois to serve as the hearing 5officer in any action for refusal to issue or renew a license, 6or for the taking of disciplinary action against a license. 7The hearing officer shall have full authority to conduct the 8hearing. The hearing officer shall report any his or her 9findings of fact, conclusions of law, and recommendations to 10the Board and the Secretary. In the report, the hearing 11officer shall make a finding of whether or not the charged 12licensee or applicant violated a provision of this Act or any 13rules adopted under this Act. Upon presenting the report to 14the Secretary, the Secretary may issue an order based on the 15report of the hearing officer. If the Secretary disagrees with 16the report of the hearing officer, the Secretary may issue an 17order in contravention of the hearing officer's report. The 18finding by the hearing officer shall not be admissible in 19evidence against the person in a criminal prosecution brought 20for a violation of this Act nor shall a finding by the hearing 21officer be a bar to a criminal prosecution brought for a 22violation of this Act. The Board shall have 90 days from 23receipt of the report to review the report of the hearing 24officer and present its findings of fact, conclusions of law 25and recommendation to the Secretary. If the Board fails to 26present its report within the 90 day period, the Secretary may   SB2494 Enrolled- 34 -LRB104 09451 AAS 19511 b1issue an order based on the report of the hearing officer. If 2the Secretary determines that the Board's report is contrary 3to the manifest weight of the evidence, he or she may issue an 4order in contravention of the Board's report.5(Source: P.A. 99-469, eff. 8-26-15.) 6    (225 ILCS 5/27)  (from Ch. 111, par. 7627)7    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)8    Sec. 27. Surrender of license. Upon the revocation or 9suspension of any license, the licensee shall forthwith 10surrender the license or licenses to the Department, and if 11the licensee he or she fails to do so, the Department shall 12have the right to seize the license.13(Source: P.A. 99-469, eff. 8-26-15.) 14    (225 ILCS 5/28)  (from Ch. 111, par. 7628)15    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)16    Sec. 28. Summary suspension of a license. The Secretary 17may summarily suspend the license of an athletic trainer 18without a hearing, simultaneously with the institution of 19proceedings for a hearing provided for in Section 20 of this 20Act, if the Secretary finds that evidence indicates that an 21athletic trainer's continuation in practice would constitute 22an imminent danger to the public. In the event that the 23Secretary summarily suspends, summarily, the license of an 24athletic trainer without a hearing, a hearing shall be   SB2494 Enrolled- 35 -LRB104 09451 AAS 19511 b1commenced within 30 days after such suspension has occurred 2and shall be concluded as expeditiously as possible.3(Source: P.A. 99-469, eff. 8-26-15.) 4    (225 ILCS 5/30)  (from Ch. 111, par. 7630)5    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)6    Sec. 30. Certifications of record; costs. The Department 7shall not be required to certify any record to the Court or 8file any answer in court or otherwise appear in any court in a 9judicial review proceeding, unless and until the Department 10has received from the plaintiff payment of the costs of 11furnishing and certifying the record, which costs shall be 12determined by the Department. Exhibits shall be certified 13without cost. Failure on the part of the plaintiff to file a 14receipt in court shall be grounds for dismissal of the action.15(Source: P.A. 99-469, eff. 8-26-15.) 16    (225 ILCS 5/6 rep.)17    (225 ILCS 5/15 rep.)18    (225 ILCS 5/21 rep.)19    (225 ILCS 5/34 rep.)20    Section 15. The Illinois Athletic Trainers Practice Act is 21amended by repealing Sections 6, 15, 21, and 34. 22    Section 20. The Respiratory Care Practice Act is amended 23by changing Sections 10, 15, 20, 22, 30, 35, 42, 50, 60, 65,   SB2494 Enrolled- 36 -LRB104 09451 AAS 19511 b170, 80, 85, 90, 95, 100, 105, 110, 135, 155, 160, 170, and 180 2and by adding Section 12 as follows: 3    (225 ILCS 106/10)4    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)5    Sec. 10. Definitions. In this Act:6    "Address of record" means the designated address recorded 7by the Department in the applicant's or licensee's application 8file or license file as maintained by the Department's 9licensure maintenance unit. It is the duty of the applicant or 10licensee to inform the Department of any change of address and 11those changes must be made either through the Department's 12website or by contacting the Department. 13    "Advanced practice registered nurse" means an advanced 14practice registered nurse licensed under the Nurse Practice 15Act. 16    "Board" means the Respiratory Care Board appointed by the 17Secretary.18    "Basic respiratory care activities" means and includes all 19of the following activities: 20        (1) Cleaning, disinfecting, and sterilizing equipment 21    used in the practice of respiratory care as delegated by a 22    licensed health care professional or other authorized 23    licensed personnel.24        (2) Assembling equipment used in the practice of 25    respiratory care as delegated by a licensed health care   SB2494 Enrolled- 37 -LRB104 09451 AAS 19511 b1    professional or other authorized licensed personnel.2        (3) Collecting and reviewing patient data through 3    non-invasive means, provided that the collection and 4    review does not include the individual's interpretation of 5    the clinical significance of the data. Collecting and 6    reviewing patient data includes the performance of pulse 7    oximetry and non-invasive monitoring procedures in order 8    to obtain vital signs and notification to licensed health 9    care professionals and other authorized licensed personnel 10    in a timely manner.11        (4) Maintaining a nasal cannula or face mask for 12    oxygen therapy in the proper position on the patient's 13    face.14        (5) Assembling a nasal cannula or face mask for oxygen 15    therapy at patient bedside in preparation for use.16        (6) Maintaining a patient's natural airway by 17    physically manipulating the jaw and neck, suctioning the 18    oral cavity, or suctioning the mouth or nose with a bulb 19    syringe.20        (7) Performing assisted ventilation during emergency 21    resuscitation using a manual resuscitator.22        (8) Using a manual resuscitator at the direction of a 23    licensed health care professional or other authorized 24    licensed personnel who is present and performing routine 25    airway suctioning. These activities do not include care of 26    a patient's artificial airway or the adjustment of   SB2494 Enrolled- 38 -LRB104 09451 AAS 19511 b1    mechanical ventilator settings while a patient is 2    connected to the ventilator. 3    "Basic respiratory care activities" does not mean 4activities that involve any of the following: 5        (1) Specialized knowledge that results from a course 6    of education or training in respiratory care.7        (2) An unreasonable risk of a negative outcome for the 8    patient.9        (3) The assessment or making of a decision concerning 10    patient care.11        (4) The administration of aerosol medication or 12    medical gas.13        (5) The insertion and maintenance of an artificial 14    airway.15        (6) Mechanical ventilatory support.16        (7) Patient assessment.17        (8) Patient education. 18        (9) The transferring of oxygen devices, for purposes 19    of patient transport, with a liter flow greater than 6 20    liters per minute, and the transferring of oxygen devices 21    at any liter flow being delivered to patients less than 12 22    years of age. 23    "Department" means the Department of Financial and 24Professional Regulation.25    "Email address of record" means the designated email 26address recorded by the Department in the applicant's or   SB2494 Enrolled- 39 -LRB104 09451 AAS 19511 b1licensee's application file or license file as maintained by 2the Department's licensure maintenance unit. 3    "Licensed" means that which is required to hold oneself 4out as a respiratory care practitioner as defined in this Act.5    "Licensed health care professional" means a physician 6licensed to practice medicine in all its branches, a licensed 7advanced practice registered nurse, or a licensed physician 8assistant.9    "Order" means a written, oral, or telecommunicated 10authorization for respiratory care services for a patient by 11(i) a licensed health care professional who maintains medical 12supervision of the patient and makes a diagnosis or verifies 13that the patient's condition is such that it may be treated by 14a respiratory care practitioner or (ii) a certified registered 15nurse anesthetist in a licensed hospital or ambulatory 16surgical treatment center. 17    "Other authorized licensed personnel" means a licensed 18respiratory care practitioner, a licensed registered nurse, or 19a licensed practical nurse whose scope of practice authorizes 20the professional to supervise an individual who is not 21licensed, certified, or registered as a health professional.22    "Proximate supervision" means a situation in which an 23individual is responsible for directing the actions of another 24individual in the facility and is physically close enough to 25be readily available, if needed, by the supervised individual. 26    "Respiratory care" and "cardiorespiratory care" mean   SB2494 Enrolled- 40 -LRB104 09451 AAS 19511 b1preventative services, evaluation and assessment services, 2therapeutic services, cardiopulmonary disease management, and 3rehabilitative services under the order of a licensed health 4care professional for an individual with a disorder, disease, 5or abnormality of the cardiopulmonary system. These terms 6include, but are not limited to, measuring, observing, 7assessing, and monitoring signs and symptoms, reactions, 8general behavior, and general physical response of individuals 9to respiratory care services, including the determination of 10whether those signs, symptoms, reactions, behaviors, or 11general physical responses exhibit abnormal characteristics; 12the administration of pharmacological and therapeutic agents 13and procedures related to respiratory care services; the 14administration of vaccinations for the prevention of 15respiratory illness upon completion of training set forth by 16rule, limited to patients 18 years of age and older pursuant to 17a valid prescription or standing order by a physician licensed 18to practice medicine in all its branches who, in the course of 19professional practice, administers vaccines to patients; the 20collection of blood specimens and other bodily fluids and 21tissues for, and the performance of, cardiopulmonary 22diagnostic testing procedures, including, but not limited to, 23blood gas analysis; development, implementation, and 24modification of respiratory care treatment plans and provision 25of education and skill training to patients and caregivers 26based on assessed abnormalities of the cardiopulmonary system,   SB2494 Enrolled- 41 -LRB104 09451 AAS 19511 b1respiratory care guidelines, referrals, and orders of a 2licensed health care professional; application, operation, and 3management of mechanical ventilatory support and other means 4of life support, including, but not limited to, hemodynamic 5cardiovascular support; and the initiation of emergency 6procedures under the rules promulgated by the Department. The 7Department shall adopt any rules necessary to implement this 8Section, including training and education requirements 9regarding vaccinations, which includes, but is not limited to, 10how to address contraindications and adverse reactions, 11appropriate vaccine storage, proper administration, the 12provision of written notice to the patient's physician, and 13record retention requirements. A respiratory care practitioner 14shall refer to a licensed health care professional physician 15licensed to practice medicine in all its branches any patient 16whose condition, at the time of evaluation or treatment, is 17determined to be beyond the scope of practice of the 18respiratory care practitioner.19    "Respiratory care education program" means a course of 20academic study leading to eligibility for registry or 21certification in respiratory care. The training is to be 22approved by an accrediting agency recognized by the Board and 23shall include an evaluation of competence through a 24standardized testing mechanism that is determined by the Board 25to be both valid and reliable.26    "Respiratory care practitioner" means a person who is   SB2494 Enrolled- 42 -LRB104 09451 AAS 19511 b1licensed by the Department of Professional Regulation and 2meets all of the following criteria:3        (1) The person is engaged in the practice of 4    cardiorespiratory care and has the knowledge and skill 5    necessary to administer respiratory care.6        (2) The person is capable of serving as a resource to 7    the licensed health care professional in relation to the 8    technical aspects of cardiorespiratory care and the safe 9    and effective methods for administering cardiorespiratory 10    care modalities.11        (3) The person is able to function in situations of 12    unsupervised patient contact requiring great individual 13    judgment.14    "Secretary" means the Secretary of Financial and 15Professional Regulation. 16(Source: P.A. 99-173, eff. 7-29-15; 99-230, eff. 8-3-15; 1799-642, eff. 7-28-16; 100-513, eff. 1-1-18.) 18    (225 ILCS 106/12 new)19    Sec. 12. Address of record; email address of record. All 20applicants and licensees shall:21        (1) provide a valid address and email address to the 22    Department, which shall serve as the address of record and 23    email address of record, respectively, at the time of 24    application for licensure or renewal of a license; and25        (2) inform the Department of any change of address of   SB2494 Enrolled- 43 -LRB104 09451 AAS 19511 b1    record or email address of record within 14 days after the 2    change either through the Department's website or by 3    contacting the Department's licensure maintenance unit. 4    (225 ILCS 106/15)5    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)6    Sec. 15. Exemptions. 7    (a) This Act does not prohibit a person legally regulated 8in this State by any other Act from engaging in any practice 9for which that person he or she is authorized.10    (b) Nothing in this Act shall prohibit the practice of 11respiratory care by a person who is employed by the United 12States government or any bureau, division, or agency thereof 13while in the discharge of the employee's official duties.14    (c) Nothing in this Act shall be construed to limit the 15activities and services of a person enrolled in an approved 16course of study leading to a degree or certificate of registry 17or certification eligibility in respiratory care if these 18activities and services constitute a part of a supervised 19course of study and if the person is designated by a title 20which clearly indicates the person's his or her status as a 21student or trainee. Status as a student or trainee shall not 22exceed 3 years from the date of enrollment in an approved 23course for an approved associate's degree program or 5 years 24for an approved bachelor's degree program.25    (d) Nothing in this Act shall prohibit a person from   SB2494 Enrolled- 44 -LRB104 09451 AAS 19511 b1treating ailments by spiritual means through prayer alone in 2accordance with the tenets and practices of a recognized 3church or religious denomination.4    (e) Nothing in this Act shall be construed to prevent a 5person who is a registered nurse, an advanced practice 6registered nurse, a licensed practical nurse, a physician 7assistant, or a physician licensed to practice medicine in all 8its branches from providing respiratory care.9    (f) Nothing in this Act shall limit a person who is 10credentialed by the National Society for Cardiopulmonary 11Technology or the National Board for Respiratory Care from 12performing pulmonary function tests and respiratory care 13procedures related to the pulmonary function test. Individuals 14who do not possess a license to practice respiratory care or a 15license in another health care field may perform basic 16screening spirometry limited to peak flow, forced vital 17capacity, slow vital capacity, and maximum voluntary 18ventilation if they possess spirometry certification from the 19National Institute for Occupational Safety and Health, an 20Office Spirometry Certificate from the American Association 21for Respiratory Care, or other similarly accepted 22certification training. 23    (g) Nothing in this Act shall prohibit the collection and 24analysis of blood by clinical laboratory personnel meeting the 25personnel standards of the Illinois Clinical Laboratory Act.26    (h) Nothing in this Act shall prohibit a polysomnographic   SB2494 Enrolled- 45 -LRB104 09451 AAS 19511 b1technologist, technician, or trainee, as defined in the job 2descriptions jointly accepted by the American Academy of Sleep 3Medicine, the Association of Polysomnographic Technologists, 4the Board of Registered Polysomnographic Technologists, and 5the American Society of Electroneurodiagnostic Technologists, 6from performing activities within the scope of practice of 7polysomnographic technology while under the direction of a 8physician licensed in this State.9    (i) Nothing in this Act shall prohibit a family member 10from providing respiratory care services to an ill person.11    (j) Nothing in this Act shall be construed to limit an 12unlicensed practitioner in a licensed hospital who is working 13under the proximate supervision of a licensed health care 14professional or other authorized licensed personnel and 15providing direct patient care services from performing basic 16respiratory care activities if the unlicensed practitioner (i) 17has been trained to perform the basic respiratory care 18activities at the facility that employs or contracts with the 19individual and (ii) at a minimum, has annually received an 20evaluation of the unlicensed practitioner's performance of 21basic respiratory care activities documented by the facility.22    (k) Nothing in this Act shall be construed to prohibit a 23person enrolled in a respiratory care education program or an 24approved course of study leading to a degree or certification 25in a health care-related discipline that provides respiratory 26care activities within the person's his or her scope of   SB2494 Enrolled- 46 -LRB104 09451 AAS 19511 b1practice and employed in a licensed hospital in order to 2provide direct patient care services under the proximate 3supervision direction of other authorized licensed personnel 4from providing respiratory care activities.5    (l) Nothing in this Act prohibits a person licensed as a 6respiratory care practitioner in another jurisdiction from 7providing respiratory care: (i) in a declared emergency in 8this State; (ii) as a member of an organ procurement team; or 9(iii) as part of a medical transport team that is transporting 10a patient into or out of this State. 11(Source: P.A. 99-230, eff. 8-3-15; 100-513, eff. 1-1-18.) 12    (225 ILCS 106/20)13    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)14    Sec. 20. Restrictions and limitations. 15    (a) No person shall, without a valid license as a 16respiratory care practitioner (i) hold oneself himself or 17herself out to the public as a respiratory care practitioner; 18(ii) use the title "respiratory care practitioner"; or (iii) 19perform or offer to perform the duties of a respiratory care 20practitioner, except as provided in Section 15 of this Act.21    (b) Nothing in the Act shall be construed to permit a 22person licensed as a respiratory care practitioner to engage 23in any manner in the practice of medicine in all its branches 24as defined by State law.25(Source: P.A. 99-230, eff. 8-3-15.)   SB2494 Enrolled- 47 -LRB104 09451 AAS 19511 b1    (225 ILCS 106/22)2    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)3    Sec. 22. Durable medical equipment use and training.4    (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Act, 5unlicensed or non-credentialed individuals who deliver 6prescribed respiratory care equipment, including, but not 7limited to, oxygen, oxygen concentrators, pulmonary hygiene 8devices, aerosol compressors and generators, suction machines, 9and positive airway pressure devices, may deliver, set up, 10calibrate, and demonstrate the mechanical operation of a 11specific piece of equipment to the patient, family, and 12caregivers, with the exception of mechanical ventilators, 13which only a licensed respiratory care practitioner or other 14authorized licensed personnel operating within the licensed 15respiratory care practitioner's or other authorized licensed 16personnel's the scope of his or her scope of practice may 17deliver and set up. Demonstration of the mechanical operation 18of a specific piece of equipment includes demonstration of the 19on-off switches, emergency buttons, and alarm silence and 20reset buttons, as appropriate. In order for unlicensed or 21non-credentialed personnel to deliver, set up, calibrate, and 22demonstrate a specific piece of equipment as allowed in this 23subsection (a), the employer must document that the employee 24has both received training and demonstrated competency using 25the specific piece of equipment under the supervision of a   SB2494 Enrolled- 48 -LRB104 09451 AAS 19511 b1respiratory care practitioner licensed by this State or some 2other licensed practitioner operating within the licensed 3practitioner's his or her scope of practice.4    Equipment demonstration is not to be interpreted as 5teaching, administration, or performance of respiratory care. 6Unlicensed or non-credentialed individuals may not attach the 7equipment to the patient or instruct the patient, family, or 8caregiver on the use of the equipment beyond the mechanical 9functions of the device.10    (b) Patients, family, and caregivers must be taught to use 11the equipment for the intended clinical application by a 12licensed respiratory care practitioner or other licensed 13health care professional operating within the licensed 14practitioner's his or her scope of practice. This instruction 15may occur through follow-up after delivery, with an identical 16model in the health care facility prior to discharge or with an 17identical model at the medical supply office. Instructions to 18the patient regarding the clinical use of equipment, patient 19monitoring, patient assessment, or any other procedure used 20with the intent of evaluating the effectiveness of the 21treatment must be performed by a respiratory care practitioner 22licensed by this State or any other licensed practitioner 23operating within the licensed practitioner's his or her scope 24of practice. 25(Source: P.A. 99-230, eff. 8-3-15.)   SB2494 Enrolled- 49 -LRB104 09451 AAS 19511 b1    (225 ILCS 106/30)2    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)3    Sec. 30. Powers and duties of the Department. Subject to 4the provision of this Act, the Department may:5        (a) Authorize examinations to ascertain the 6    qualifications and fitness of an applicant for licensure 7    as a respiratory care practitioner.8        (b) Pass upon the qualifications of an applicant for 9    licensure by endorsement.10        (c) Conduct hearings on proceedings to refuse to 11    issue, renew, or revoke a license or to suspend, place on 12    probation, or reprimand a license issued or applied for 13    under this Act.14        (d) Formulate rules required for the administration of 15    this Act. Notice of proposed rulemaking shall be 16    transmitted to the Board, and the Department shall review 17    the Board's response and any recommendations made in the 18    response. 19        (e) Solicit the advice and expert knowledge of the 20    Board on any matter relating to the administration and 21    enforcement of this Act.22        (f) (Blank).23        (g) (Blank). Maintain a roster of the names and 24    addresses of all licenses and all persons whose licenses 25    have been suspended, revoked, or denied renewal for cause 26    within the previous calendar year. The roster shall be   SB2494 Enrolled- 50 -LRB104 09451 AAS 19511 b1    available upon written request and payment of the required 2    fee.3(Source: P.A. 99-230, eff. 8-3-15.) 4    (225 ILCS 106/35)5    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)6    Sec. 35. Respiratory Care Board. 7    (a) The Secretary shall appoint a Respiratory Care Board 8which shall serve in an advisory capacity to the Secretary. 9The Board shall consist of 5 7 persons of which 3 4 members 10shall be currently engaged in the practice of respiratory care 11with a minimum of 3 years practice in the State of Illinois, 12one member shall be a qualified medical director, and one 13member 2 members shall be a hospital administrator 14administrators.15    (b) Members shall be appointed to a 4-year term. A member 16whose term has expired shall continue to serve until his or her 17successor is appointed and qualified. No member shall be 18reappointed to the Board for a term that would cause his or her 19continuous service on the Board to be longer than 10 years. 20Appointments to fill vacancies shall be made in the same 21manner as original appointments for the unexpired portion of 22the vacated term. 23    (c) The membership of the Board shall reasonably represent 24all the geographic areas in this State. The Secretary shall 25consider the recommendations of the organization representing   SB2494 Enrolled- 51 -LRB104 09451 AAS 19511 b1the largest number of respiratory care practitioners for 2appointment of the respiratory care practitioner members of 3the Board and the organization representing the largest number 4of physicians licensed to practice medicine in all its 5branches for the appointment of the medical director to the 6Board.7    (d) The Secretary has the authority to remove any member 8of the Board for cause at any time before the expiration of his 9or her term. The Secretary shall be the sole arbiter of cause.10    (e) The Secretary shall consider the recommendations of 11the Board on questions involving standards of professional 12conduct, discipline, and qualifications of candidates for 13licensure under this Act.14    (f) The members of the Board shall be reimbursed for all 15legitimate and necessary expenses incurred in attending 16meetings of the Board.17    (g) A majority of the current members of Four members of 18the Board shall constitute a quorum. A vacancy in the 19membership of the Board shall not impair the right of a quorum 20to exercise all of the rights and perform all of the duties of 21the Board. 22    (h) Members of the Board shall be immune from suit in any 23action based upon any disciplinary proceedings or other 24activities performed as members of the Board, except for 25willful and wanton misconduct. 26(Source: P.A. 99-230, eff. 8-3-15.)   SB2494 Enrolled- 52 -LRB104 09451 AAS 19511 b1    (225 ILCS 106/42)2    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)3    Sec. 42. Social Security Number or Individual Taxpayer 4Identification Number on license application. In addition to 5any other information required to be contained in the 6application, every application for an original license under 7this Act shall include the applicant's Social Security Number 8or Individual Taxpayer Identification Number, which shall be 9retained in the agency's records pertaining to the license. As 10soon as practical, the Department shall assign a customer's 11identification number to each applicant for a license.12    Every application for a renewal or restored license shall 13require the applicant's customer identification number. 14(Source: P.A. 97-400, eff. 1-1-12.) 15    (225 ILCS 106/50)16    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)17    Sec. 50. Qualifications for a license. 18    (a) A person is qualified to be licensed as a licensed 19respiratory care practitioner, and the Department may issue a 20license authorizing the practice of respiratory care to an 21applicant who:22        (1) has applied in writing or electronically on the 23    prescribed form and has paid the required fee;24        (2) has successfully completed a respiratory care   SB2494 Enrolled- 53 -LRB104 09451 AAS 19511 b1    training program approved by the Department;2        (3) has successfully passed an examination for the 3    practice of respiratory care authorized by the Department, 4    within 5 years of making application; and5        (4) has paid the fees required by this Act.6    Any person who has received certification by any state or 7national organization whose standards are accepted by the 8Department as being substantially similar to the standards in 9this Act may apply for a respiratory care practitioner license 10without examination.11    (b) Beginning 6 months after December 31, 2005, all 12individuals who provide satisfactory evidence to the 13Department of 3 years of experience, with a minimum of 400 14hours per year, in the practice of respiratory care during the 155 years immediately preceding December 31, 2005 shall be 16issued a license, unless the license may be denied under 17Section 95 of this Act. This experience must have been 18obtained while under the supervision of a certified 19respiratory therapist, a registered respiratory therapist, or 20a licensed registered nurse or under the supervision or 21direction of a licensed health care professional. All 22applications for a license under this subsection (b) shall be 23postmarked within 12 months after December 31, 2005.24    (c) A person may practice as a respiratory care 25practitioner if he or she has applied in writing to the 26Department in form and substance satisfactory to the   SB2494 Enrolled- 54 -LRB104 09451 AAS 19511 b1Department for a license as a licensed respiratory care 2practitioner and has complied with all the provisions under 3this Section except for the passing of an examination to be 4eligible to receive such license, until the Department has 5made the decision that the applicant has failed to pass the 6next available examination authorized by the Department or has 7failed, without an approved excuse, to take the next available 8examination authorized by the Department or until the 9withdrawal of the application, but not to exceed 6 months. An 10applicant practicing professional registered respiratory care 11under this subsection (c) who passes the examination, however, 12may continue to practice under this subsection (c) until such 13time as he or she receives his or her license to practice or 14until the Department notifies him or her that the license has 15been denied. No applicant for licensure practicing under the 16provisions of this subsection (c) shall practice professional 17respiratory care except under the proximate direct supervision 18of a licensed health care professional or authorized licensed 19personnel. In no instance shall any such applicant practice or 20be employed in any supervisory capacity.21(Source: P.A. 94-523, eff. 1-1-06.) 22    (225 ILCS 106/60)23    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)24    Sec. 60. Professional identification; advertising. 25    (a) A person who is licensed pursuant to this Act with the   SB2494 Enrolled- 55 -LRB104 09451 AAS 19511 b1Department of Professional Regulation in this State may use 2the title "respiratory care practitioner" and the abbreviation 3"RCP".4    (b) A licensee shall include in every advertisement for 5services regulated under this Act the licensee's his or her 6title as it appears on the license or the initials authorized 7under this Act.8(Source: P.A. 91-310, eff. 1-1-00; 91-357, eff. 7-29-99.) 9    (225 ILCS 106/65)10    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)11    Sec. 65. Licenses; renewal; restoration; inactive status. 12    (a) The expiration date and renewal period for each 13license issued under this Act shall be set by rule. The 14licensee may renew a license during the 30 day period 15preceding its expiration date by paying the required fee and 16demonstrating compliance with any continuing education 17requirements.18    (b) A person who has permitted a license to expire or who 19has a license on inactive status may have it restored by 20submitting an application to the Department and filing proof 21of fitness, as defined by rule, to have the license restored, 22including, if appropriate, evidence that is satisfactory to 23the Department certifying the active practice of respiratory 24care in another jurisdiction and by paying the required fee.25    A person practicing on an expired license is considered to   SB2494 Enrolled- 56 -LRB104 09451 AAS 19511 b1be practicing without a license.2    (c) If the person has not maintained an active practice 3that is satisfactory to the Department in another 4jurisdiction, the Department shall determine the person's 5fitness to resume active status. The Department may require 6the person to complete a specified period of evaluated 7respiratory care and may require successful completion of an 8examination.9    (d) A person whose license expired while that person he or 10she was (1) in federal service on active duty with the Armed 11Forces of the United States or called into service or training 12with the State Militia, or (2) in training or education under 13the supervision of the United States government preliminary to 14induction into military service may have the his or her 15license restored without paying any lapsed renewal fees if, 16within 2 years after the termination of the person's his or her 17service, training, or education, except under conditions other 18than honorable, the Department is furnished with satisfactory 19evidence that the person has been so engaged and that the 20service, training, or education has been terminated.21    (e) A license to practice shall not be denied any 22applicant because of the applicant's race, religion, creed, 23national origin, political beliefs, or activities, age, sex, 24sexual orientation, or physical impairment.25(Source: P.A. 99-230, eff. 8-3-15.)   SB2494 Enrolled- 57 -LRB104 09451 AAS 19511 b1    (225 ILCS 106/70)2    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)3    Sec. 70. Inactive status. A person who notifies the 4Department in writing on forms prescribed by the Department 5may elect to place the person's his or her license on an 6inactive status and shall, subject to rules of the Department, 7be excused from payment of renewal fees until that person he or 8she notifies the Department in writing of a desire to resume 9active status.10    A person requesting restoration from inactive status shall 11be required to pay the current renewal fee and shall be 12required to restore the his or her license as provided in 13Section 65 of this Act.14    Practice by a respiratory care practitioner whose license 15is in an inactive status shall be considered to be the 16unlicensed practice of respiratory care and shall be grounds 17for discipline under this Act.18(Source: P.A. 89-33, eff. 1-1-96.) 19    (225 ILCS 106/80)20    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)21    Sec. 80. Returned checks; fines. Any person who delivers a 22check or other payment to the Department that is returned to 23the Department unpaid by the financial institution upon which 24it is drawn shall pay to the Department, in addition to the 25amount already owed to the Department, a fine of $50. The fines   SB2494 Enrolled- 58 -LRB104 09451 AAS 19511 b1imposed by this Section are in addition to any other 2discipline provided under this Act for unlicensed practice or 3practice on a nonrenewed license. The Department shall notify 4the person that payment of fees and fines shall be paid to the 5Department by certified check or money order within 30 6calendar days of the notification. If, after the expiration of 730 days from the date of the notification, the person has 8failed to submit the necessary remittance, the Department 9shall automatically terminate the license or certificate or 10deny the application, without hearing. If, after termination 11or denial, the person seeks a license or certificate, that 12person he or she shall apply to the Department for restoration 13or issuance of the license or certificate and pay all fees and 14fines due to the Department. The Department may establish a 15fee for the processing of an application for restoration of a 16license or certificate to pay all expenses of processing this 17application. The Secretary may waive the fines due under this 18Section in individual cases where the Secretary finds that the 19fines would be unreasonable or unnecessarily burdensome.20(Source: P.A. 99-230, eff. 8-3-15.) 21    (225 ILCS 106/85)22    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)23    Sec. 85. Endorsement. 24    (a) The Department may issue a license as a respiratory 25care practitioner without the required examination, to an   SB2494 Enrolled- 59 -LRB104 09451 AAS 19511 b1applicant licensed under the laws of another state or United 2States jurisdiction whose standards in the opinion of the 3Department, are substantially equivalent at the date of the 4his or her licensure in the other jurisdiction to the 5requirements of this Act or the applicant, at the time of 6licensure, possessed individual qualifications which were 7substantially equivalent to the requirements of this Act. The 8applicant shall pay all of the required fees.9    (b) An applicant shall have 3 years from the date of 10application to complete the application process. If the 11process has not been completed within 3 years, the application 12shall be denied, the fee forfeited, and the applicant must 13reapply and meet the requirements in effect at the time of 14reapplication.15(Source: P.A. 89-33, eff. 1-1-96.) 16    (225 ILCS 106/90)17    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)18    Sec. 90. Continuing education. Proof or certification of 19having met the minimum requirement of continuing education as 20determined by the Department shall be required of all license 21and certificate renewals. Pursuant to rule, the continuing 22education requirement may upon petition be waived in whole or 23in part if the respiratory care practitioner can demonstrate 24that the practitioner he or she had served in the Coast Guard 25or Armed Forces, had an extreme hardship as defined by rule, or   SB2494 Enrolled- 60 -LRB104 09451 AAS 19511 b1obtained the license or certification by examination or 2endorsement within the preceding renewal period.3    The Department shall establish by rule a means for the 4verification of completion of the continuing education 5required by this Section. This verification may be 6accomplished through audits of records maintained by 7licensees; by requiring the filing of continuing education 8certificates with the Department; or by other means 9established by the Department.10(Source: P.A. 89-33, eff. 1-1-96.) 11    (225 ILCS 106/95)12    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)13    Sec. 95. Grounds for discipline. 14    (a) The Department may refuse to issue, renew, or may 15revoke, suspend, place on probation, reprimand, or take other 16disciplinary or non-disciplinary action as the Department 17considers appropriate, including the issuance of fines not to 18exceed $10,000 for each violation, with regard to any license 19for any one or combination of the following:20        (1) Material misstatement in furnishing information to 21    the Department or to any other State or federal agency.22        (2) Violations of this Act, or any of the rules 23    adopted under this Act.24        (3) Conviction by plea of guilty or nolo contendere, 25    finding of guilt, jury verdict, or entry of judgment or by   SB2494 Enrolled- 61 -LRB104 09451 AAS 19511 b1    sentencing of any crime, including, but not limited to, 2    convictions preceding sentences of supervision, 3    conditional discharge, or first offender probation, under 4    the laws of any jurisdiction of the United States or any 5    state or territory thereof: (i) that is a felony or (ii) 6    that is a misdemeanor, an essential element of which is 7    dishonesty, or that is directly related to the practice of 8    the profession.9        (4) Making any misrepresentation for the purpose of 10    obtaining a license.11        (5) Professional incompetence or negligence in the 12    rendering of respiratory care services.13        (6) Malpractice.14        (7) Aiding or assisting another person in violating 15    any rules or provisions of this Act.16        (8) Failing to provide information within 60 days in 17    response to a written request made by the Department.18        (9) Engaging in dishonorable, unethical, or 19    unprofessional conduct of a character likely to deceive, 20    defraud, or harm the public.21        (10) Violating the rules of professional conduct 22    adopted by the Department.23        (11) Discipline by another jurisdiction, if at least 24    one of the grounds for the discipline is the same or 25    substantially equivalent to those set forth in this Act.26        (12) Directly or indirectly giving to or receiving   SB2494 Enrolled- 62 -LRB104 09451 AAS 19511 b1    from any person, firm, corporation, partnership, or 2    association any fee, commission, rebate, or other form of 3    compensation for any professional services not actually 4    rendered. Nothing in this paragraph (12) affects any bona 5    fide independent contractor or employment arrangements 6    among health care professionals, health facilities, health 7    care providers, or other entities, except as otherwise 8    prohibited by law. Any employment arrangements may include 9    provisions for compensation, health insurance, pension, or 10    other employment benefits for the provision of services 11    within the scope of the licensee's practice under this 12    Act. Nothing in this paragraph (12) shall be construed to 13    require an employment arrangement to receive professional 14    fees for services rendered. 15        (13) A finding that the licensee, after having the her 16    or his license placed on probationary status or subject to 17    conditions or restrictions, has violated the terms of 18    probation or failed to comply with such terms or 19    conditions.20        (14) Abandonment of a patient.21        (15) Willfully filing false records or reports 22    relating to a licensee's practice including, but not 23    limited to, false records filed with a federal or State 24    agency or department.25        (16) Willfully failing to report an instance of 26    suspected child abuse or neglect as required by the Abused   SB2494 Enrolled- 63 -LRB104 09451 AAS 19511 b1    and Neglected Child Reporting Act.2        (17) Providing respiratory care, other than pursuant 3    to an order.4        (18) Physical or mental disability including, but not 5    limited to, deterioration through the aging process or 6    loss of motor skills that results in the inability to 7    practice the profession with reasonable judgment, skill, 8    or safety.9        (19) Solicitation of professional services by using 10    false or misleading advertising.11        (20) Failure to file a tax return, or to pay the tax, 12    penalty, or interest shown in a filed return, or to pay any 13    final assessment of tax penalty, or interest, as required 14    by any tax Act administered by the Illinois Department of 15    Revenue or any successor agency or the Internal Revenue 16    Service or any successor agency.17        (21) Irregularities in billing a third party for 18    services rendered or in reporting charges for services not 19    rendered.20        (22) Being named as a perpetrator in an indicated 21    report by the Department of Children and Family Services 22    under the Abused and Neglected Child Reporting Act, and 23    upon proof by clear and convincing evidence that the 24    licensee has caused a child to be an abused child or 25    neglected child as defined in the Abused and Neglected 26    Child Reporting Act.  SB2494 Enrolled- 64 -LRB104 09451 AAS 19511 b1        (23) Habitual or excessive use or addiction to 2    alcohol, narcotics, stimulants, or any other chemical 3    agent or drug that results in an inability to practice 4    with reasonable skill, judgment, or safety.5        (24) Being named as a perpetrator in an indicated 6    report by the Department on Aging under the Adult 7    Protective Services Act, and upon proof by clear and 8    convincing evidence that the licensee has caused an adult 9    with disabilities or an older adult to be abused or 10    neglected as defined in the Adult Protective Services Act.11        (25) Willfully failing to report an instance of 12    suspected abuse, neglect, financial exploitation, or 13    self-neglect of an adult with disabilities or an older 14    adult as required by the Adult Protective Services Act.15        (26) Willful omission to file or record, or willfully 16    impeding the filing or recording, or inducing another 17    person to omit to file or record medical reports as 18    required by law or willfully failing to report an instance 19    of suspected child abuse or neglect as required by the 20    Abused and Neglected Child Reporting Act.21        (27) Practicing under a false or assumed name, except 22    as provided by law.23        (28) Willfully or negligently violating the 24    confidentiality between licensee and patient, except as 25    required by law.26        (29) The use of any false, fraudulent, or deceptive   SB2494 Enrolled- 65 -LRB104 09451 AAS 19511 b1    statement in any document connected with the licensee's 2    practice. 3    (b) The determination by a court that a licensee is 4subject to involuntary admission or judicial admission as 5provided in the Mental Health and Developmental Disabilities 6Code will result in an automatic suspension of the licensee's 7his or her license. The suspension will end upon a finding by a 8court that the licensee is no longer subject to involuntary 9admission or judicial admission, the issuance of an order so 10finding and discharging the patient, and the recommendation of 11the Board to the Secretary that the licensee be allowed to 12resume the licensee's his or her practice.13    All fines imposed under this Section shall be paid within 1460 days after the effective date of the order imposing the fine 15or in accordance with the terms set forth in the order imposing 16the fine. 17(Source: P.A. 98-49, eff. 7-1-13; 99-230, eff. 8-3-15.) 18    (225 ILCS 106/100)19    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)20    Sec. 100. Violations; injunctions; cease and desist order. 21    (a) If a person violates any provision of this Act, the 22Secretary may, in the name of the People of the State of 23Illinois, through the Attorney General, petition for an order 24enjoining the violation or an order enforcing compliance with 25this Act. Upon the filling of a verified petition, the court   SB2494 Enrolled- 66 -LRB104 09451 AAS 19511 b1with appropriate jurisdiction may issue a temporary 2restraining order without notice or bond and may preliminarily 3and permanently enjoin the violation. If it is established 4that the person has violated or is violating the injunction, 5the court may punish the offender for contempt of court. 6Proceedings under this Section are in addition to all other 7remedies and penalties provided by this Act.8    (b) If a person holds oneself himself or herself out as 9being a respiratory care practitioner under this Act and is 10not licensed to do so, then any licensed respiratory care 11practitioner, interested party, or injured person may petition 12for relief as provided in subsection (a) of this Section.13    (c) Whenever, in the opinion of the Department, a person 14violates any provision of this Act, the Department may issue a 15rule to show cause why an order to cease and desist should not 16be entered against that person. The rule shall clearly set 17forth the grounds relied upon by the Department and shall 18allow at least 7 days from the date of the rule to file an 19answer satisfactory to the Department. Failure to answer to 20the satisfaction of the Department shall cause an order to 21cease and desist to be issued.22(Source: P.A. 99-230, eff. 8-3-15.) 23    (225 ILCS 106/105)24    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)25    Sec. 105. Investigations; notice; hearing. The Department   SB2494 Enrolled- 67 -LRB104 09451 AAS 19511 b1may investigate the actions of an applicant, a licensee, or a 2person claiming to hold a license. The Department shall, 3before revoking, suspending, placing on probation, 4reprimanding, or taking any other disciplinary action under 5Section 95 of this Act, at least 30 days before the date set 6for the hearing (i) notify the accused, in writing, of any 7charges made and the time and place for the hearing on the 8charges, (ii) direct the accused him or her to file a written 9answer to the charges with the Board under oath within 20 days 10after the service upon the accused him or her of the notice, 11and (iii) inform the accused that, if the accused fails he or 12she fails to answer, default will be taken against the accused 13him or her and the accused's his or her license may be 14suspended, revoked, placed on probationary status, or other 15disciplinary action taken with regard to the license, 16including limiting the scope, nature, or extent of the 17accused's his or her practice, without a hearing, as the 18Department may consider proper. In case the person, after 19receiving notice, fails to file an answer, the person's his or 20her license may, in the discretion of the Department, be 21suspended, revoked, placed on probationary status, or the 22Department may take whatever disciplinary action is considered 23proper, including, limiting the scope, nature, or extent of 24the person's practice or the imposition of a fine, without a 25hearing, if the act or acts charged constitute sufficient 26grounds for an action under this Act. The written notice may be   SB2494 Enrolled- 68 -LRB104 09451 AAS 19511 b1served by personal delivery or certified mail to the address 2of record or by email to the email address of record.3(Source: P.A. 99-230, eff. 8-3-15.) 4    (225 ILCS 106/110)5    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)6    Sec. 110. Record of proceedings; transcript. The 7Department, at its expense, shall provide a certified 8shorthand reporter to take down the testimony and preserve the 9record of all proceedings at a formal hearing of any case. The 10notice of hearing, complaint, all other documents in the 11nature of pleadings and written motions filed in the 12proceedings, the transcript of testimony, the report of the 13Board and orders of the Department shall be in the record of 14the proceedings. The record may be made available to any 15person interested in the hearing upon payment of the fee 16required by Section 2105-115 of the Department of Professional 17Regulation Law of the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. 18(Source: P.A. 99-230, eff. 8-3-15.) 19    (225 ILCS 106/135)20    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)21    Sec. 135. Secretary; rehearing. Whenever the Secretary 22believes that substantial justice has not been done in the 23revocation, suspension, refusal to issue or renew a license, 24or any other discipline of an applicant or licensee, the   SB2494 Enrolled- 69 -LRB104 09451 AAS 19511 b1Secretary he or she may order a rehearing by the same or other 2hearing officers.3(Source: P.A. 99-230, eff. 8-3-15.) 4    (225 ILCS 106/155)5    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)6    Sec. 155. Surrender of license. Upon the revocation or 7suspension of a license, the licensee shall immediately 8surrender the his or her license to the Department. If the 9licensee fails to do so, the Department has the right to seize 10the license.11(Source: P.A. 89-33, eff. 1-1-96.) 12    (225 ILCS 106/160)13    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)14    Sec. 160. Summary suspension of license. The Secretary may 15summarily suspend the license of a respiratory care 16practitioner without a hearing, simultaneously with the 17institution of proceedings for a hearing provided for in 18Section 105 of this Act, if the Secretary finds that evidence 19in the Secretary's his or her possession indicates that the 20continuation of practice by the respiratory care practitioner 21would constitute an imminent danger to the public. In the 22event that the Secretary summarily suspends the license of 23respiratory care practitioner without a hearing, a hearing 24must be commenced within 30 calendar days after the suspension   SB2494 Enrolled- 70 -LRB104 09451 AAS 19511 b1has occurred and concluded as expeditiously as practical.2(Source: P.A. 99-230, eff. 8-3-15.) 3    (225 ILCS 106/170)4    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)5    Sec. 170. Administrative review; certification of record; 6costs. 7    All final administrative decisions of the Department are 8subject to judicial review pursuant to the Administrative 9Review Law and its rules. The term "administrative decision" 10is defined as in Section 3-101 of the Code of Civil Procedure.11    Proceedings for judicial review shall be commenced in the 12circuit court of the county in which the party applying for 13review resides, but if the party is not a resident of this 14State, the venue shall be in Sangamon County. 15    The Department shall not be required to certify any record 16to the court, or file an answer in court, or otherwise appear 17in any court in a judicial review proceeding, unless and until 18the Department has received from the plaintiff payment of the 19costs of furnishing and certifying the record, which costs 20shall be determined by the Department. Exhibits shall be 21certified without cost. Failure on the part of the plaintiff 22to file a receipt is grounds for dismissal of the action. 23During the pendency and hearing of any and all judicial 24proceedings incident to the disciplinary action, the sanctions 25imposed upon the accused by the Department specified in the   SB2494 Enrolled- 71 -LRB104 09451 AAS 19511 b1Department's final administrative decision shall, as a matter 2of public policy, remain in full force and effect in order to 3protect the public pending final resolution of any of the 4proceedings. 5(Source: P.A. 99-230, eff. 8-3-15.) 6    (225 ILCS 106/180)7    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)8    Sec. 180. Illinois Administrative Procedure Act; 9application. The Illinois Administrative Procedure Act is 10hereby expressly adopted and incorporated in this Act as if 11all of the provisions of the Act were included in this Act, 12except that the provision of paragraph (d) of Section 10-65 of 13the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act, which provides that 14at hearings the registrant or licensee has the right to show 15compliance with all lawful requirements for retention or 16continuation or renewal of the license, is specifically 17excluded. For the purpose of this Act, the notice required 18under Section 10-25 of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 19Act is considered sufficient when mailed to address of record 20or emailed to the email address of record of the licensee or 21applicant.22(Source: P.A. 99-230, eff. 8-3-15.) 23    Section 99. Effective date. This Section and Section 5 24take effect upon becoming law.